Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  Section 6, chapter  660, Oregon Laws 1985, as amended by section 1, chapter 108,
Oregon Laws 1993,  section 1, chapter 215, Oregon Laws 2003, and section 1, chapter 191, Oregon
Laws 2011, is amended to read:
Sec. 6.  ORS 307.540 to 307.548 apply to tax years beginning on or after January 1, 1985, and
before July 1, [ 2027] 2033.
SECTION 2. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date  on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by House April 9, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 21, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2077 (HB 2077-INTRO) Page 1